New Jersey, session 222, A3076.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Attorney General shall study the use of artificial intelligence technology by law enforcement agencies for the purpose of generating police reports and shall issue a report to the Governor and the Legislature, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1) concerning the use of the technology.  The report shall be issued within six months of the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). b.  The report shall include, but not be limited to: (1)   an assessment of the artificial intelligence technology available for use in generating police reports and the feasibility of its use; (2)   a Statewide summary of any current use of artificial intelligence technology by law enforcement agencies for the purpose of generating police reports; and (3)   recommendations for implementing a Statewide policy applicable to State and local law enforcement agencies that governs the use of artificial intelligence technology.  The policy, at a minimum, shall require a law enforcement officer to review any contents of a police report generated by artificial intelligence to ensure accuracy and completeness prior to issuing the report. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.